Massachusetts, session 194th, H4107.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) For the purposes of section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Cardiopulmonary resuscitation” or “CPR”, an emergency procedure consisting of
ventilations, or breathing for the victim, and chest compressions.
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary
education established in section 1A of chapter 69.
“Department”, the department of elementary and secondary education established in
section 1A of chapter 69.
of 7

“Emergency medical services” or “EMS”, the pre-hospital assessment and treatment and
other services utilized in responding to an emergency or provided during the transport of patients
to appropriate health care facilities.
“Emergency medical technician” or “EMT”, a person who has successfully completed a
course in emergency medical care, approved by the department of public health or offered by an
accredited course sponsor, and who is certified by the department of public health. The term
emergency medical technician shall include EMT–Basic, EMT-Intermediate and EMT–
Paramedic.
(b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund known as the CPR and EMS High School Training Fund, hereinafter referred to as the fund.
The purpose of the fund shall be to: (i) establish and support CPR trainings for high school
students; (ii) establish and support EMS career awareness sessions for high school students; (iii)
establish and support an EMS ambassador program with the department of public health to work
with high schools; and (iv) provide aid and financial incentives to high school students for CPR
and EMS trainings and certifications. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner.
(c) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest
earned on money in the fund; (iii) contributions from private sector entities, including local EMS
agencies or non-profits, foundations and other organizations; and (iv) federal grants and other
gifts, grants and donations for the establishment and support of emergency medical services.
Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
of 7

(d) The commissioner shall make expenditures from the fund including, but not limited
to, the following purposes: (i) grants for high schools to cover the costs of CPR equipment and
training materials for CPR trainings in high schools pursuant to section 102 of chapter 71; (ii)
hosting annual EMS career awareness sessions at high schools; (iii) an EMS ambassador
program for visits to high schools to mentor high school students and promote EMS careers; (iv)
scholarships for high school students obtaining CPR certification and enrolling in EMS training
programs within 1 year of graduation; and (v) tuition credit of up to $1,000 for students who
complete CPR training and enrollment in a community college, state college or public university
EMT-Basic program within 1 year of graduation.
(e) The department shall annually, not later than December 31, report on the activity of
the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on education; (ii) chairs of the joint committee
on public health; (iii) chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and (iv) the
clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 102. (a) For the purposes of section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Cardiopulmonary resuscitation” or “CPR”, an emergency procedure consisting of
ventilations, or breathing for the victim, and chest compressions.
“Department”, the department of elementary and secondary education established in
section 1A of chapter 69.
of 7

“Emergency medical services” or “EMS”, the pre-hospital assessment and treatment and
other services utilized in responding to an emergency or provided during the transport of patients
to appropriate health care facilities.
“Emergency medical technician” or “EMT”, a person who has successfully completed a
course in emergency medical care, approved by the department of public health or offered by an
accredited course sponsor, and who is certified by the department of public health. The term
emergency medical technician shall include EMT–Basic, EMT-Intermediate and EMT–
Paramedic.
“High school”, part of the public school system that furnishes instruction to grades 9 to
12 including vocational and charter schools.
(b) The department may establish CPR trainings in high schools for the purposes of: (i)
enhancing public safety and strengthening the emergency medical services workforce in the
commonwealth; and (ii) incorporating career exploration opportunities in emergency medical
services for high school students.
(c) High school students in the commonwealth may complete a certified CPR training
program as part of the health education curriculum pursuant to section 1L of chapter 69. The
CPR training shall include: (i) hands-on practice in chest compressions and the use of automated
external defibrillators; and (ii) information about recognizing medical emergencies and calling
911.
(d) High school students who successfully complete the CPR program shall receive a
CPR certification valid for 2 years.
of 7

(e) High schools may partner with local EMS agencies or non-profits such as the
American Heart Association for training support.
(f) As part of the CPR training program, high schools may host annual EMS career
awareness sessions. The EMS career awareness sessions may include presentations by local
EMS professionals, demonstrations of EMS equipment and information on EMT and paramedic
career pathways.
(g) The department of public health, in collaboration with EMS agencies, shall establish
an EMS ambassador program. Ambassadors shall be comprised of EMTs, paramedics and EMS
high school students who shall visit high schools to mentor high school students and promote
EMS careers.
(h) High schools may provide information on local EMT-Basic training programs,
including community college, state college, public university and hybrid online options. High
school students who express interest in pursuing an EMS career shall be connected with training
providers and receive guidance on financial aid options.
(i) High school students shall be encouraged to enroll in an EMT-Basic training class at a
community college, state college or public university. High schools may partner with local EMS
agencies and community colleges, state colleges or public universities to offer training programs
during school hours or as an after-school elective.
(j) High schools achieving high student CPR certification rates shall be eligible for state
recognition awards. Students obtaining CPR certification and enrolling in EMS training
programs within 1 year of graduation shall qualify for a $500 scholarship.
of 7

(k) High school students who complete CPR training and enroll in a community college,
state college or public university EMT-Basic program within 1 year of graduation shall receive a
tuition credit of up to $1,000. Community colleges, state colleges and public universities shall
waive the cost of EMT-Basic training for students committing to work with a Massachusetts
100 EMS agency for at least 2 years post-certification.
101 (l) High school students from low income families who enroll in an EMT-Basic training
102 class at a community college, state college or public university pursuant to subsection (i) shall
103 have financial assistance made available to them to cover the costs related to textbooks and
104 training materials.
105 (m) This section shall be funded by the CPR and EMS High School Training Fund
106 established in section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29.
107 (n) The requirements under this section shall take effect beginning with the 2026-2027
108 academic year.
109 (o) High schools that establish CPR trainings shall submit annual reports at the end of
110 each school year to the department detailing the number of students trained, certification rates
111 and participation in EMS career sessions. The department, in consultation with the department of
112 public health, shall review program outcomes and provide recommendations for improvement.
113 (p) The department shall prepare an annual report, not later than December 31, on the
114 program established in this section that shall include: (i) the number of high school students
115 participating in the program; (ii) high schools participation and utilization of incentives; (iii) data
116 collected from the high schools annual reports pursuant to subsection (o); and (iv) any
117 recommendations for improvements to the program. The annual report shall be submitted to: the
of 7

118 chairs of the joint committee on education; the chairs of the joint committee on public health;
119 and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
120 SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
of 7